src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! !!!NOUN AFFIXES
! =====

LEXICON N-INIT
NCL ;


! The class prefixes
! ------------------

LEXICON NCL
1^1/2+:umu%> NCL1/2 ;
+2^1/2+:ba%> NCL1/2 ;
+1a^1a/2a+:u%> NCL1a/2a ;
+2a^1a/2a+:o%> NCL1a/2a ;
+3^3/4+:um%> NCL3/4 ;
!i+5^5/6+:i%> NCL5/6 ;
i+5^5/6+:ili%> NCL5/6 ;
+6^5/6+:ama%> NCL5/6 ;
+7^7/8+:isi%> NCL7/8 ;
+8^7/8+:izi%> NCL7/8 ;
+9^9/10+:in%> NCL9/10 ;
+10^9/10+:izin%> NCL9/10 ;
+9^9/6+:in%> NCL9/6 ;
+6^9/6+:ama%> NCL9/6 ;
!+u+11+:u%> NCL11 ;
+11+:ulu%> NCL11 ;
+14:u%> NCL14 ;
+15+:uku%> NCL15 ;



! The postnominal morphology
! --------------------------

LEXICON NDim
+N: ENDLEX ;
+N+Dim:%>ana ENDLEX ;
