src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
! The nouns
! ---------

LEXICON NCL1/2 
ntu NDim "person" ;
lungu NDim "white person" ;


LEXICON NCL1a/2a 
baba NDim "father" ;

LEXICON NCL3/4 
fula  NDim "river" ;

LEXICON NCL5/6 
bhayisikili NDim "bicycle" ;

LEXICON NCL7/8 
kole NDim "school" ;

LEXICON NCL9/10 
dlu NDim "house" ;

LEXICON NCL9/6
doda NDim "man" ;
kosi NDim "chief" ; ! does not cover irregular pl -kh-
tombazane NDim "girl" ; ! does not cover irregular pl -a

LEXICON NCL11
debe NDim "lip" ;

LEXICON NCL14 
ntu NDim "human nature" ;

LEXICON NCL15
hamba NDim "travellng" ;
